Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1410
Commission; duties.

In carrying out its duties, the commission shall:

(1) Encourage initiatives and collaboration between public institutions, public state and local entities, and private state and local entities to increase the contribution of postsecondary education in advancing Nebraska's economy;

(2) Encourage the governing boards and administrators of public institutions to review instructional practices, curriculum design and content, and related academic considerations to facilitate improvements that enhance the quality of education in the state;

(3) Encourage the interaction of public institutions with elementary and secondary educational institutions to facilitate joint planning initiatives regarding matters such as prior and subsequent learning practices and content, class or credit agreements for high school students enrolling in college-level programs, and shared instructional assignments; and

(4) Develop only those programs, activities, or functions (a) authorized by Article VII, section 14, of the Constitution of Nebraska or the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act or (b) as directed by the Legislature. The commission, at its discretion, may develop programs, activities, or functions requested by the Legislature or the Governor. The commission may not direct any public institution to undertake any action unless authorized by Article VII, section 14, of the Constitution of Nebraska or the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 816, § 13.